Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-225
City council, officers, employees; solicitation of political support; persons, corporations furnishing same; violations; penalties.

No officer or agent of the city shall solicit, directly or indirectly the political support of any contractor, municipal franchised corporation or railway company, or the officials or agents of such companies, for any municipal election or for any other election or primary election held in the city in pursuance of law. Nor shall any franchised corporation or railway company through its agents or officials, or by any other means, furnish or appropriate any money, directly or indirectly, to promote the success or defeat of any person whomsoever, in any election or primary election held in such city, or to promote or prevent the appointment or confirmation of any appointive officer of such city. A violation of any of these provisions on the part of any officer or agent of the city shall be deemed malfeasance in office, and upon conviction thereof such officer shall be removed from office by the order of the court, and fined in any sum not to exceed five hundred dollars. A violation of any of these provisions on the part of any franchised corporation through its officials or agents, upon conviction by any court of competent jurisdiction, shall subject such corporation to forfeiture of its franchise and the imposition of a fine of not exceeding five hundred dollars upon every officer or agent of such company who shall have been proved guilty of such violation.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 23, p. 431;

C.S.1922, § 3549;

C.S.1929, § 14-224;

R.S.1943, § 14-225.